Washington statutes.
RCW 43.300.020

Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise:

(1) "Department" means the department of fish and wildlife.

(2) "Director" means the director of fish and wildlife.

(3) "Commission" means the fish and wildlife commission.

[ 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 3.]